Hawaii statutes.
§201-72 Office of aerospace
development; establishment. (a) There is established an office of
aerospace development in the department of business, economic development, and
tourism.

(b) The director shall have experience,
knowledge, and expertise in space-related activities and development. The
director shall be nominated and appointed by the governor without regard to
chapter 76.

(c) The director shall hire staff necessary to
carry out the purposes of this part.

(d) The director and employees of the office
shall be included in any benefit program generally applicable to the officers
and employees of the State. [L 1988, c 355, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 293, §8; am
L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2007, c 149, §2(3)]

Revision Note

In subsection (c),
"part" substituted for "chapter".

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next